Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 08.13.200.
Deposit of receipts. [Repealed, § 54 ch 37 SLA 1985.]

Sec. 08.13.210.
Health and sanitary conditions.

Health and sanitary conditions in shops and schools of

barbering, hairdressing, hair braiding, manicuring, and esthetics shall be supervised by the board;

tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, and body piercing shall be supervised by the Department of Environmental Conservation.

The Department of Environmental Conservation shall conduct an annual inspection of each shop licensed for the practice of tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing to ensure that the shop meets the department’s standards of cleanliness and sanitation established under AS

44.46.020

. If the Department of Environmental Conservation determines that the shop is not in compliance with a regulation of the department, the department shall report the violation to the board and take appropriate action under its own regulations.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am § 13 ch 137 SLA 1986; am § 25 ch 57 SLA 1999; am §§ 22, 23 ch 93 SLA 2000; am § 24 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 9, art. 4.

For schools and curriculum, see 12 AAC 9, art. 5.

For barbering, hairdressing, manicuring, or esthetics schools and shops, see 18 AAC 23, art. 2.

For body piercing, tattooing, or permanent cosmetic coloring shops, see 18 AAC 23, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a)(1), inserted “hair braiding,” following “hairdressing,”, added “shall be supervised by the board;” at the end, and made related and stylistic changes; in (b), deleted “for the practice of” preceding “body piercing” and made stylistic changes.

Sec. 08.13.215.
Notification requirements for tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, and body piercing.

Before performing a tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing procedure on a client, a practitioner shall give written educational information, approved by the board, to the client.

After completing a tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing procedure on a client, the practitioner shall give written aftercare instructions, approved by the board, to the client. The written instructions

must include advice to the client to consult a physician at the first sign of infection;

must contain the name, address, and telephone number of the shop where the procedure was performed;

shall be signed and dated by the client and the practitioner; the practitioner shall keep the original and provide a copy to the client.

The owner of a shop for tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing shall prominently display

a copy of the statement provided by the board under AS

08.13.030(b)

that advises the public of the health risks and possible consequences of tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing, as applicable;

the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development and the Department of Environmental Conservation and a description of how a complaint about the shop or a practitioner in the shop may be filed with either entity or with the board.

History.

(§ 24 ch 93 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 14 SLA 2005; am § 25 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in (c)(2) of this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 9, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, in (a) and (b), substituted “or body piercing procedure” for “procedure or a body piercing procedure”, and made stylistic changes throughout the section.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 14, SLA 2005 (SB 52), amending (c) of this section, see 2005 Senate Journal 42 — 43.

Sec. 08.13.217.
Tattooing and permanent cosmetic coloring or body piercing on a minor.

A person may not practice tattooing or permanent cosmetic coloring on a minor.

A person may not practice body piercing on a minor without prior written permission from the minor’s parent or legal guardian and the presence of the parent or legal guardian during the body piercing procedure. The person who performs the body piercing shall keep a copy of the written permission on file for at least three years.

A person who with criminal negligence violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. In this subsection, “criminal negligence” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 24 ch 93 SLA 2000; am § 26 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, in (a), substituted “practice tattooing or permanent cosmetic coloring” for “practice tattooing and permanent cosmetic coloring”.

Sec. 08.13.220.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“apprentice” means a person who receives on-the-job training under direct supervision;

“barbering” means shaving, trimming, or cutting, styling, curling, permanent waving, bleaching, coloring, cleansing, or chemically straightening the beard or hair of a living person for a fee and for cosmetic purposes;

“board” means the Board of Barbers and Hairdressers;

“body piercing” means puncturing the body of a person by aid of needles or other instruments designed to be used to puncture the body for the purpose of inserting jewelry or other objects in or through the human body, except that, for purposes of this chapter, “body piercing” does not include puncturing the external part of the human ear;

“esthetics” means the use of the hands, appliances, cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, or lotions in massaging, cleansing, stimulating, or similar work on the scalp, face or neck, including skin care, make-up, and temporary removal of superfluous hair, for cosmetic purposes for a fee;

“hair braiding” means braiding natural hair, natural fibers, synthetic fibers, and hair extensions, trimming hair extensions for braiding purposes, and attaching natural and synthetic hair by braiding for cosmetic purposes and for a fee; “hair braiding” does not include styling wigs or making wigs;

“hairdressing” means performing, for a fee, the following services for cosmetic purposes:

trimming or cutting the beard of a living person; and

arranging, styling, dressing, curling, temporary waving, permanent waving, cutting, singeing, bleaching, coloring, cleansing, conditioning, or similar work on the hair of a living person;

“instructor” means a person who teaches barbering, hairdressing, manicuring, or esthetics in a school or who supervises an apprentice in barbering, hairdressing, or esthetics;

“limited esthetics” means to perform for a fee for cosmetic purposes

temporary removal of superfluous hair on the face or neck, including eyebrow arching by use of wax; or

application of makeup or false eyelashes;

“manicuring”

means, for a fee, to

cut, trim, polish, color, tint, or cleanse a natural or artificial nail;

affix material by artificial means to a natural nail for the addition to or extension of the natural nail;

cleanse, treat, or beautify the hands or feet for cosmetic purposes; or

otherwise treat the nails of the hand or foot except as provided in (B) of this paragraph;

notwithstanding (A) of this paragraph, does not include

massage treatment; or

cleansing, treating, or beautifying the hands or feet solely for the treatment of disease or physical or mental ailments;

“non-chemical barbering” means shaving, trimming, cutting, styling, or curling the beard or hair of a living person for a fee and for cosmetic purposes;

“permanent cosmetic coloring” means tattooing for the purpose of simulating hair or makeup, such as permanent eyeliner, lip color, eyebrows, and eyeshadow;

“practitioner” means a person licensed to practice barbering, non-chemical barbering, hairdressing, hair braiding, manicuring, esthetics, tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing under this chapter;

“shampoo person” means a person who, for a fee and under the supervision of a practitioner of barbering or hairdressing, cleanses or conditions the hair of the human head with products that have no effect other than cleaning or conditioning the hair;

“shop” is an establishment operated for the purpose of engaging in barbering, hairdressing, hair braiding, manicuring, esthetics, tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing;

“tattooing ” means the process by which the skin is marked or colored to form indelible marks, figures, or decorative designs for nonmedical purposes by inserting or ingraining an indelible pigment into or onto the skin, microblading, or microneedling.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am §§ 14 — 17 ch 137 SLA 1986; am §§ 26 — 31 ch 57 SLA 1999; am §§ 25 — 28 ch 93 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 133 SLA 2002; am §§ 27 — 30 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was reorganized in 1987, 1999, 2000, 2002, and 2018 to maintain alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, in (10) [now (13)], inserted “non-chemical barbering,” following “barbering,” and “hair braiding,” following “hairdressing,”; in (12) [now (15)], inserted “hair braiding,” following “hairdressing,”; rewrote (13) [now (16)], which read, “’tattooing and permanent cosmetic coloring’ means the process by which the skin is marked or colored by insertion of nontoxic dyes or pigments into the dermal layer of the skin so as to form indelible marks, figures, or decorative designs for nonmedical purposes.”; added (14) [now (6)], (15) [now (11)], and (16) [now (12)]; made related and stylistic changes throughout.